Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 5 Precincts Using Optical Scanning Voting Equipment
21-2-485.
Responsibilities of poll officers.

As soon as the polls are closed and the last elector has voted in precincts in which optical scanners are used, the poll officers shall:

For central count optical scan ballots:

Seal the ballot box and deliver the ballot box to the tabulating center, as designated by the superintendent; and

Examine the ballots and separate those ballots containing write-in votes.

Record in ink the designation of the polling place and a serial number on all write-in ballots, starting with the number one, and place the same number on the ballot voted by the same elector, so that write-in ballots may be identified with the corresponding ballots.

After the write-in ballots have been so marked, place the write-in ballots in an envelope marked “Write-in Ballots” and designate the polling place and the number of write-in ballots contained therein on such envelope, which shall be sealed and signed by the managers and placed in the ballot container with the other ballots.

Place any ballot that is so torn, bent, or mutilated that it may not be counted by the tabulating machine in an envelope marked “Defective Ballots” and place the envelope in the container with other ballots; and

For precinct count optical scan ballots:

Feed ballots from the auxiliary compartment of the ballot box, if any, through the tabulator; and

After all ballots have been fed through the tabulator the poll officer shall cause the tabulator to print out a tape with the total votes cast in each election.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-485

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 41.

21-2-486.
Votes for write-in candidates.

The superintendent, in computing the votes cast at any election, shall compute and certify only those write-in votes properly cast for candidates who have given proper notice of intent to be write-in candidates pursuant to Code Section 21-2-133 exactly as such names were written by the elector.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-486

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 41.